test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns1-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
    idee+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: ideesid
    idee+N+Pl+Tra: ideedeks
    idee+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: ideiks
    idee+N+Pl+Trm: ideedeni
    idee+N+Sg+Abe: ideeta
    idee+N+Sg+Abl: ideelt
    idee+N+Sg+Ade: ideel
    idee+N+Sg+All: ideele
    idee+N+Sg+Com: ideega
    idee+N+Sg+Ela: ideest
    idee+N+Sg+Ess: ideena
    idee+N+Sg+Gen: idee
    idee+N+Sg+Ill: ideesse
    idee+N+Sg+Ine: idees
    idee+N+Sg+Nom: idee
    idee+N+Sg+Par: ideed
    idee+N+Sg+Tra: ideeks
    idee+N+Sg+Trm: ideeni
    jalg+N+Pl+Abe: jalgadeta
    jalg+N+Pl+Abl: jalgadelt
    jalg+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: jalgelt
    jalg+N+Pl+Ade: jalgadel
    jalg+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: jalgel
    jalg+N+Pl+All: jalgadele
    jalg+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: jalgele
    jalg+N+Pl+Com: jalgadega
    jalg+N+Pl+Ela: jalgadest
    jalg+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: jalgest
    jalg+N+Pl+Ess: jalgadena
    jalg+N+Pl+Gen: jalgade
    jalg+N+Pl+Ill: jalgadesse
    jalg+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: jalgesse
    jalg+N+Pl+Ine: jalgades
    jalg+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: jalges
    jalg+N+Pl+Nom: jalad
    jalg+N+Pl+Par: jalgu
    jalg+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: jalgasid
    jalg+N+Pl+Tra: jalgadeks
    jalg+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: jalgeks
    jalg+N+Pl+Trm: jalgadeni
    jalg+N+Sg+Abe: jalata
    jalg+N+Sg+Abl: jalalt
    jalg+N+Sg+Ade: jalal
    jalg+N+Sg+All: jalale
    jalg+N+Sg+Com: jalaga
    jalg+N+Sg+Ela: jalast
    jalg+N+Sg+Ess: jalana
    jalg+N+Sg+Gen: jala
    jalg+N+Sg+Ill: jalga
    jalg+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: jalasse
    jalg+N+Sg+Ine: jalas
    jalg+N+Sg+Nom: jalg
    jalg+N+Sg+Par: jalga
    jalg+N+Sg+Tra: jalaks
    jalg+N+Sg+Trm: jalani
    kaabe+N+Pl+Abe: kaapmeteta
    kaabe+N+Pl+Abl: kaapmetelt
    kaabe+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kaapmeilt
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ade: kaapmetel
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kaapmeil
    kaabe+N+Pl+All: kaapmetele
    kaabe+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kaapmeile
    kaabe+N+Pl+Com: kaapmetega
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ela: kaapmetest
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kaapmeist
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ess: kaapmetena
    kaabe+N+Pl+Gen: kaapmete
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ill: kaapmetesse
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kaapmeisse
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ine: kaapmetes
    kaabe+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kaapmeis
    kaabe+N+Pl+Nom: kaapmed
    kaabe+N+Pl+Par: kaapmeid
    kaabe+N+Pl+Tra: kaapmeteks
    kaabe+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kaapmeiks
    kaabe+N+Pl+Trm: kaapmeteni
    kaabe+N+Sg+Abe: kaapmeta
    kaabe+N+Sg+Abl: kaapmelt
    kaabe+N+Sg+Ade: kaapmel
    kaabe+N+Sg+All: kaapmele
    kaabe+N+Sg+Com: kaapmega
    kaabe+N+Sg+Ela: kaapmest
    kaabe+N+Sg+Ess: kaapmena
    kaabe+N+Sg+Gen: kaapme
    kaabe+N+Sg+Ill: kaapmesse
    kaabe+N+Sg+Ine: kaapmes
    kaabe+N+Sg+Nom: kaabe
    kaabe+N+Sg+Par: kaabet
    kaabe+N+Sg+Tra: kaapmeks
    kaabe+N+Sg+Trm: kaapmeni
    kaaren+N+Pl+Abe: kaarnateta
    kaaren+N+Pl+Abl: kaarnatelt
    kaaren+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kaarnailt
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ade: kaarnatel
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kaarnail
    kaaren+N+Pl+All: kaarnatele
    kaaren+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kaarnaile
    kaaren+N+Pl+Com: kaarnatega
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ela: kaarnatest
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kaarnaist
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ess: kaarnatena
    kaaren+N+Pl+Gen: kaarnate
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ill: kaarnatesse
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kaarnaisse
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ine: kaarnates
    kaaren+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kaarnais
    kaaren+N+Pl+Nom: kaarnad
    kaaren+N+Pl+Par: kaarnaid
    kaaren+N+Pl+Tra: kaarnateks
    kaaren+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kaarnaiks
    kaaren+N+Pl+Trm: kaarnateni
    kaaren+N+Sg+Abe: kaarnata
    kaaren+N+Sg+Abl: kaarnalt
    kaaren+N+Sg+Ade: kaarnal
    kaaren+N+Sg+All: kaarnale
    kaaren+N+Sg+Com: kaarnaga
    kaaren+N+Sg+Ela: kaarnast
    kaaren+N+Sg+Ess: kaarnana
    kaaren+N+Sg+Gen: kaarna
    kaaren+N+Sg+Ill: kaarnasse
    kaaren+N+Sg+Ine: kaarnas
    kaaren+N+Sg+Nom: kaaren
    kaaren+N+Sg+Par: kaarnat
    kaaren+N+Sg+Tra: kaarnaks
    kaaren+N+Sg+Trm: kaarnani
    kabinet+N+Pl+Abe: kabinettideta
    kabinet+N+Pl+Abl: kabinettidelt
    kabinet+N+Pl+Ade: kabinettidel
    kabinet+N+Pl+All: kabinettidele
    kabinet+N+Pl+Com: kabinettidega
    kabinet+N+Pl+Ela: kabinettidest
    kabinet+N+Pl+Ess: kabinettidena
    kabinet+N+Pl+Gen: kabinettide
    kabinet+N+Pl+Ill: kabinettidesse
    kabinet+N+Pl+Ine: kabinettides
    kabinet+N+Pl+Nom: kabinetid
    kabinet+N+Pl+Par: kabinette
    kabinet+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kabinettisid
    kabinet+N+Pl+Tra: kabinettideks
    kabinet+N+Pl+Trm: kabinettideni
    kabinet+N+Sg+Abe: kabinetita
    kabinet+N+Sg+Abl: kabinetilt
    kabinet+N+Sg+Ade: kabinetil
    kabinet+N+Sg+All: kabinetile
    kabinet+N+Sg+Com: kabinetiga
    kabinet+N+Sg+Ela: kabinetist
    kabinet+N+Sg+Ess: kabinetina
    kabinet+N+Sg+Gen: kabineti
    kabinet+N+Sg+Ill: kabinetti
    kabinet+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kabinetisse
    kabinet+N+Sg+Ine: kabinetis
    kabinet+N+Sg+Nom: kabinet
    kabinet+N+Sg+Par: kabinetti
    kabinet+N+Sg+Tra: kabinetiks
    kabinet+N+Sg+Trm: kabinetini
    kael+N+Pl+Abe: kaelteta
    kael+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: kaeladeta
    kael+N+Pl+Abl: kaeltelt
    kael+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kaeladelt
    kael+N+Pl+Ade: kaeltel
    kael+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kaeladel
    kael+N+Pl+All: kaeltele
    kael+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kaeladele
    kael+N+Pl+Com: kaeltega
    kael+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: kaeladega
    kael+N+Pl+Ela: kaeltest
    kael+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kaeladest
    kael+N+Pl+Ess: kaeltena
    kael+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: kaeladena
    kael+N+Pl+Gen: kaelte
    kael+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: kaelade
    kael+N+Pl+Ill: kaeltesse
    kael+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kaeladesse
    kael+N+Pl+Ine: kaeltes
    kael+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kaelades
    kael+N+Pl+Nom: kaelad
    kael+N+Pl+Par: kaelu
    kael+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kaelasid
    kael+N+Pl+Tra: kaelteks
    kael+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kaeladeks
    kael+N+Pl+Trm: kaelteni
    kael+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: kaeladeni
    kael+N+Sg+Abe: kaelata
    kael+N+Sg+Abl: kaelalt
    kael+N+Sg+Ade: kaelal
    kael+N+Sg+All: kaelale
    kael+N+Sg+Com: kaelaga
    kael+N+Sg+Ela: kaelast
    kael+N+Sg+Ess: kaelana
    kael+N+Sg+Gen: kaela
    kael+N+Sg+Ill: kaela
    kael+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kaelasse
    kael+N+Sg+Ine: kaelas
    kael+N+Sg+Nom: kael
    kael+N+Sg+Par: kaela
    kael+N+Sg+Tra: kaelaks
    kael+N+Sg+Trm: kaelani
    kandvus+N+Pl+Abe: kandvusteta
    kandvus+N+Pl+Abl: kandvustelt
    kandvus+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: [kandvuseilt, kandvusilt]
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ade: kandvustel
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: [kandvuseil, kandvusil]
    kandvus+N+Pl+All: kandvustele
    kandvus+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: [kandvuseile, kandvusile]
    kandvus+N+Pl+Com: kandvustega
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ela: kandvustest
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: [kandvuseist, kandvusist]
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ess: kandvustena
    kandvus+N+Pl+Gen: kandvuste
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ill: kandvustesse
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: [kandvuseisse, kandvusisse]
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ine: kandvustes
    kandvus+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: [kandvuseis, kandvusis]
    kandvus+N+Pl+Nom: kandvused
    kandvus+N+Pl+Par: kandvusi
    kandvus+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kandvuseid
    kandvus+N+Pl+Tra: kandvusteks
    kandvus+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: [kandvuseiks, kandvusiks]
    kandvus+N+Pl+Trm: kandvusteni
    kandvus+N+Sg+Abe: kandvuseta
    kandvus+N+Sg+Abl: kandvuselt
    kandvus+N+Sg+Ade: kandvusel
    kandvus+N+Sg+All: kandvusele
    kandvus+N+Sg+Com: kandvusega
    kandvus+N+Sg+Ela: kandvusest
    kandvus+N+Sg+Ess: kandvusena
    kandvus+N+Sg+Gen: kandvuse
    kandvus+N+Sg+Ill: kandvusse
    kandvus+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: kandvusesse
    kandvus+N+Sg+Ine: kandvuses
    kandvus+N+Sg+Nom: kandvus
    kandvus+N+Sg+Par: kandvust
    kandvus+N+Sg+Tra: kandvuseks
    kandvus+N+Sg+Trm: kandvuseni
    kannel+N+Pl+Abe: kanneldeta
    kannel+N+Pl+Abe+Use/NotNorm: kandleteta
    kannel+N+Pl+Abl: kanneldelt
    kannel+N+Pl+Abl+Use/NotNorm: kandletelt
    kannel+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: kandleilt
    kannel+N+Pl+Ade: kanneldel
    kannel+N+Pl+Ade+Use/NotNorm: kandletel
    kannel+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: kandleil
    kannel+N+Pl+All: kanneldele
    kannel+N+Pl+All+Use/NotNorm: kandletele
    kannel+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: kandleile
    kannel+N+Pl+Com: kanneldega
    kannel+N+Pl+Com+Use/NotNorm: kandletega
    kannel+N+Pl+Ela: kanneldest
    kannel+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NotNorm: kandletest
    kannel+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: kandleist
    kannel+N+Pl+Ess: kanneldena
    kannel+N+Pl+Ess+Use/NotNorm: kandletena
    kannel+N+Pl+Gen: kannelde
    kannel+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NotNorm: kandlete
    kannel+N+Pl+Ill: kanneldesse
    kannel+N+Pl+Ill+Use/NotNorm: kandletesse
    kannel+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: kandleisse
    kannel+N+Pl+Ine: kanneldes
    kannel+N+Pl+Ine+Use/NotNorm: kandletes
    kannel+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: kandleis
    kannel+N+Pl+Nom: kandled
    kannel+N+Pl+Par: kandleid
    kannel+N+Pl+Tra: kanneldeks
    kannel+N+Pl+Tra+Use/NotNorm: kandleteks
    kannel+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: kandleiks
    kannel+N+Pl+Trm: kanneldeni
    kannel+N+Pl+Trm+Use/NotNorm: kandleteni
    kannel+N+Sg+Abe: kandleta
    kannel+N+Sg+Abl: kandlelt
    kannel+N+Sg+Ade: kandlel
    kannel+N+Sg+All: kandlele
    kannel+N+Sg+Com: kandlega
    kannel+N+Sg+Ela: kandlest
    kannel+N+Sg+Ess: kandlena
    kannel+N+Sg+Gen: kandle
    kannel+N+Sg+Ill: kandlesse
    kannel+N+Sg+Ine: kandles
    kannel+N+Sg+Nom: kannel
    kannel+N+Sg+Par: kannelt
    kannel+N+Sg+Tra: kandleks
    kannel+N+Sg+Trm: kandleni
    katus+N+Pl+Abe: katusteta
    katus+N+Pl+Abl: katustelt
    katus+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: katuseilt
    katus+N+Pl+Ade: katustel
    katus+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: katuseil
    katus+N+Pl+All: katustele
    katus+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: katuseile
    katus+N+Pl+Com: katustega
    katus+N+Pl+Ela: katustest
    katus+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: katuseist
    katus+N+Pl+Ess: katustena
    katus+N+Pl+Gen: katuste
    katus+N+Pl+Ill: katustesse
    katus+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: katuseisse
    katus+N+Pl+Ine: katustes
    katus+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: katuseis
    katus+N+Pl+Nom: katused
    katus+N+Pl+Par: katuseid
    katus+N+Pl+Tra: katusteks
    katus+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: katuseiks
    katus+N+Pl+Trm: katusteni
    katus+N+Sg+Abe: katuseta
    katus+N+Sg+Abl: katuselt
    katus+N+Sg+Ade: katusel
    katus+N+Sg+All: katusele
    katus+N+Sg+Com: katusega
    katus+N+Sg+Ela: katusest
    katus+N+Sg+Ess: katusena
    katus+N+Sg+Gen: katuse
    katus+N+Sg+Ill: katusesse
    katus+N+Sg+Ine: katuses
    katus+N+Sg+Nom: katus
    katus+N+Sg+Par: katust
    katus+N+Sg+Tra: katuseks
    katus+N+Sg+Trm: katuseni
    kaup+N+Pl+Abe: kaupadeta
    kaup+N+Pl+Abl: kaupadelt
    kaup+N+Pl+Ade: kaupadel
    kaup+N+Pl+All: kaupadele
    kaup+N+Pl+Com: kaupadega
    kaup+N+Pl+Ela: kaupadest
    kaup+N+Pl+Ess: kaupadena
    kaup+N+Pl+Gen: kaupade
    kaup+N+Pl+Ill: kaupadesse
    kaup+N+Pl+Ine: kaupades
    kaup+N+Pl+Nom: kaubad
    kaup+N+Pl+Par: kaupu
    kaup+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kaupasid
    kaup+N+Pl+Tra: kaupadeks
    kaup+N+Pl+Trm: kaupadeni
    kaup+N+Sg+Abe: kaubata
    kaup+N+Sg+Abl: kaubalt
    kaup+N+Sg+Ade: kaubal
    kaup+N+Sg+All: kaubale
    kaup+N+Sg+Com: kaubaga
    kaup+N+Sg+Ela: kaubast
    kaup+N+Sg+Ess: kaubana
    kaup+N+Sg+Gen: kauba
    kaup+N+Sg+Ill: kaupa
    kaup+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kaubasse
    kaup+N+Sg+Ine: kaubas
    kaup+N+Sg+Nom: kaup
    kaup+N+Sg+Par: kaupa
    kaup+N+Sg+Tra: kaubaks
    kaup+N+Sg+Trm: kaubani
    kauss+N+Pl+Abe: kaussideta
    kauss+N+Pl+Abl: kaussidelt
    kauss+N+Pl+Ade: kaussidel
    kauss+N+Pl+All: kaussidele
    kauss+N+Pl+Com: kaussidega
    kauss+N+Pl+Ela: kaussidest
    kauss+N+Pl+Ess: kaussidena
    kauss+N+Pl+Gen: kausside
    kauss+N+Pl+Ill: kaussidesse
    kauss+N+Pl+Ine: kaussides
    kauss+N+Pl+Nom: kausid
    kauss+N+Pl+Par: kausse
    kauss+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: kaussisid
    kauss+N+Pl+Tra: kaussideks
    kauss+N+Pl+Trm: kaussideni
    kauss+N+Sg+Abe: kausita
    kauss+N+Sg+Abl: kausilt
    kauss+N+Sg+Ade: kausil
    kauss+N+Sg+All: kausile
    kauss+N+Sg+Com: kausiga
    kauss+N+Sg+Ela: kausist
    kauss+N+Sg+Ess: kausina
    kauss+N+Sg+Gen: kausi
    kauss+N+Sg+Ill: kaussi
    kauss+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: kausisse
    kauss+N+Sg+Ine: kausis
    kauss+N+Sg+Nom: kauss
    kauss+N+Sg+Par: kaussi
    kauss+N+Sg+Tra: kausiks
    kauss+N+Sg+Trm: kausini
    keel+N+Pl+Abe: keelteta
